pl: Technika montażu wirnika: Na 4 śruby; Na 6 śrub; Center lock (pierścień zewnętrzny); Center lock (pierścień wewnętrzny); Wielowypustowy (zastrzeżony); Inny
hu: Rotor rögzítési felülete: 4 csavaros; 6 csavaros; Center Lock (külső rögzítőgyűrűs); Center Lock (belső rögzítőgyűrűs); Bordás (egyedi); Egyéb
sl-SI: Vrsta izdelave rotorja: 4 vijaki; 6 vijakov; Center lock (zunanji zaskočni obroč); Center lock (notranji zaskočni obroč); Zobata os (lastniško); Drugo
ru: Интерфейс крепления ротора: 4 болта; 6 болтов; Center Lock (внешнее стопорное кольцо); Center Lock (внутреннее стопорное кольцо); Шлицевое (проприетарное); Другое
nb: Monteringsgrensesnitt for rotor: 4-bolt; 6-bolt; Senterlås (utvendig låsering); Senterlås (innvendig låsering); Spline (proprietær); Annet
sv: Gränssnitt för rotormontering.: 4-bult; 6-bult; Centerlock (yttre låsring); Centerlock (inre låsring); Splines (patenterad); Övrigt
it: Interfaccia di montaggio del rotore: A 4 fori; A 6 fori; Center Lock (ghiera esterna); Center Lock (ghiera interna); Scanalato (proprietario); Altro
sk-SK: Montážne rozhranie rotora: 4-skrutkový; 6-skrutkový; Center lock (externá poistná matica); Center lock (interná poistná matica); Drážkovaný (proprietárny); Iné
bg-BG: Интерфейс за монтаж на ротора: С 4 болта; С 6 болта; Center lock (външен заключващ пръстен); Center lock (вътрешен заключващ пръстен); Шлиц (собствен стандарт); Друго
en: Rotor mounting interface: 4-bolt; 6-bolt; Center lock (external lockring); Center lock (internal lockring); Spline (proprietary); Other
fi: Roottorin asennuspinta: 4-pulttinen; 6-pulttinen; Center lock (ulkoinen lukkorengas); Center lock (sisäinen lukkorengas); Uritettu (valmistajakohtainen); Muu
ro-RO: Interfață de montare a rotorului: Cu 4 șuruburi; Cu 6 șuruburi; Center Lock (inel de blocare extern); Center Lock (inel de blocare intern); Canelat (proprietar); Altele
fr: Interface de fixation du rotor: 4 vis; 6 vis; Center Lock (écrou externe); Center Lock (écrou interne); Cannelé (propriétaire); Autre
cs: Rozhraní pro montáž rotoru: 4 šrouby; 6 šroubů; Center Lock (vnější pojistná matice); Center Lock (vnitřní pojistná matice); Drážkovaný (chráněný); Jiné
hr-HR: Sučelje za montažu rotora: 4 vijka; 6 vijaka; Center Lock (vanjski prsten); Center Lock (unutarnji prsten); Žlijeb (vlasnički); Ostalo
lt-LT: Rotoriaus montavimo sąsaja: 4 varžtų; 6 varžtų; „Center lock“ (išorinis fiksavimo žiedas); „Center lock“ (vidinis fiksavimo žiedas); Išdrožinis (nuosavybinis); Kita
es: Interfaz de montaje del rotor: 4 tornillos; 6 tornillos; Center lock (anillo de bloqueo externo); Center lock (anillo de bloqueo interno); Ranurado (patentado); Otro
vi: Giao diện gắn roto: 4 bu lông; 6 bu lông; Khóa giữa (vòng khóa ngoài); Khóa giữa (vòng khóa trong); Rãnh then (độc quyền); Khác
de: Scheibenbremsenadapter: 4-Loch; 6-Loch; Center Lock (externer Verschlussring); Center Lock (interner Verschlussring); Spline (proprietär); Sonstige
da: Monteringsgrænseflade for rotor: 4 bolte; 6 bolte; Center lock (udvendig låsering); Center lock (indvendig låsering); Spline (proprietær); Andet
ko: 로터 장착 인터페이스: 4볼트; 6볼트; 센터 락(외부 락링); 센터 락(내부 락링); 스플라인(독점); 기타
nl: Type rotorbevestiging: 4-bouts; 6-bouts; Center Lock (externe sluitring); Center Lock (interne sluitring); Spline (eigen); Overige
pt-BR: Disco de freio, interface de fixação: 4 furos; 6 furos; Center lock (anel de fixação externo); Center lock (anel de fixação interno); Estriado (proprietário); Outro
zh-CN: 刹车片安装接口: 4 螺栓; 6 螺栓; 中心锁死（外置锁紧环）; 中心锁死（内置锁紧环）; 花键（专有）; 其他
zh-TW: 轉子安裝介面: 4 螺栓; 6 螺栓; 中心鎖死 (外鎖環); 中心鎖死 (內鎖環); 栓槽 (專利); 其他
el: Διεπαφή στερέωσης ρότορα: 4 βιδών; 6 βιδών; Κεντρικό κλείδωμα (εξωτερικός δακτύλιος); Κεντρικό κλείδωμα (εσωτερικός δακτύλιος); Σφηνωτός (proprietary); Άλλο
ja: ローターマウントインターフェース: 4 ボルト; 6 ボルト; センターロック (外側ロックリング); センターロック (内側ロックリング); スプライン (独自規格); その他
pt-PT: Interface de montagem do rotor: 4 parafusos; 6 parafusos; Center Lock (anel de fixação externo); Center Lock (anel de fixação interno); Estriado (proprietário); Outro
tr: Rotor montaj arayüzü: 4 cıvata; 6 cıvata; Merkezi kilit (dış kilitleme halkası); Merkezi kilit (iç kilitleme halkası); Kama (özel); Diğer
th: อินเทอร์เฟซการติดตั้งใบพัด: 4 รูนอต; 6 รูนอต; Center lock (แหวนล็อกด้านนอก); Center lock (แหวนล็อกด้านใน); Spline (เฉพาะแบรนด์); อื่นๆ